Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB399.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5536(a) introductory paragraph and (b)(1) of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 5536. Construction projects.(a) General rule.--Except as provided in subsection (b), a civil action or proceeding brought against any person lawfully performing or furnishing the design, planning, supervision or observation of construction, or construction of any improvement to real property must be commenced within [12] six years after completion of construction of such improvement to recover damages for:* * *(b) Exceptions.--12345678910111213141516171819 (1) If an injury or wrongful death shall occur more than [ten] four and within [12] six years after completion of the improvement a civil action or proceeding within the scope of subsection (a) may be commenced within the time otherwise limited by this subchapter, but not later than [14] eight years after completion of construction of such improvement.* * *(d) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "lawfully" means a person who, when required by law, is licensed or otherwise authorized by law to perform or furnish the design, planning, supervision or observation of construction. The term includes the design and construction of any improvement to real property or a person who has secured a permit for the construction of improvements to real property.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0399PN0346 - 2 - 123456789101112131415